Arkansas, session 2025, HB1073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Job creation is a priority for the state;
(2) The manufacturing, installation, and operation of advanced
energy systems is a growth industry and should be encouraged;
(3) The composition and structure of the nation’s energy system
is transitioning to a system with near zero (0) emissions to be more:
(A) Engaging with customers; and
(B) Resilient in adapting to weather-induced electrical
grid impacts;
(4) Many electric utility companies have voluntarily announced
goals to transition to advanced energy systems;
(5) Many major businesses desire to reduce their carbon
footprint to meet market-driven sustainability goals and may use access to
advanced energy systems as a determining factor for business location;
(6) Planning for the creation of advanced energy jobs requires
input from all stakeholders;
(7) To ensure Arkansas can fully capitalize on the many
*ANS085*
12/12/2024 10:41:50 AM ANS085

HB1073
employment opportunities in this growing industry, the creation of an
advanced energy jobs task force can add significant value to the state's
economic development efforts; and
(8) By promoting the adoption of advanced electricity systems by
Arkansas businesses and expanding on advanced energy technical training
options with educational institutions, the state can continue to grow its
economy while taking advantage of some of the most innovative initiatives in
the nation.

SECTION 2. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Advanced Energy Jobs
Task Force – Creation – Duties — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Advanced electricity resource" means any fuel, technology,
or policy that generates electricity or facilitates the production of
electricity with improved efficiency, reduced environmental impact, and
advanced capabilities;
(2) "Advanced electricity system" means the entirety of an
electrical grid system, including without limitation:
(A) A diverse portfolio of advanced electricity resources,
both centralized and distributed generation;
(B) An annual electric grid carbon intensity of fifty
grams carbon dioxide equivalent per kilowatt hour (50g CO₂e/kWh) or less;
(C) A transmission and distribution network;
(D) Energy storage facilities;
(E) Demand response capabilities, including without
limitation:
(i) Smart metering;
(ii) Information infrastructure;
(iii) Implementation policies; and
(iv) Utility and customer communications;
(F) Policies and programs that support energy efficiency
and conservation measures; and
(G) Market structures that properly incentivize:
(i) Deployment of advanced electricity resources;
(ii) Reasonably rapid deployment of an optimal mix
of advanced electricity resources that provides near zero (0) emissions
12/12/2024 10:41:50 AM

HB1073
electricity at low overall electricity system cost;
(iii) Reliable and resilient electricity system
performance; and
(iv) Reasonable, stable, nonvolatile energy pricing
for ratepayers;
(3) "Carbon intensity" means the amount of global warming
potential of greenhouse gases emitted to produce a given amount of electrical
power, measured on an annual basis and expressed in grams of carbon dioxide
equivalent per kilowatt hour (g CO₂e/kWh);
(4) "Direct emissions" means the carbon intensity of emissions
from operation and maintenance of an energy source;
(5) "Greenhouse gas" means carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous
oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, sulfur hexafluoride, or any
other gas identified by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission
as a gas that traps heat in the atmosphere;
(6)(A) "Indirect emissions" means the carbon intensity of the
full energy chain for an energy resource, exclusive of the direct emissions.
(B) "Indirect emissions" includes without limitation the:
(i) Mining, processing, and transporting of
materials for energy resource equipment;
(ii) Manufacturing, transporting, and installing of
energy resource equipment;
(iii) Decommissioning or disposing of energy
resource equipment; and
(iv) Mining, processing, and transporting of
combustion fuel; and
(7) "Near zero (0) emissions" means electricity production that
achieves a nominal value of zero grams carbon dioxide equivalent per kilowatt
hour (0g CO₂e/kWh) to fifty grams carbon dioxide equivalent per kilowatt hour
(50g CO₂e/kWh), measured on an annual basis.
(b) There is created the Advanced Energy Jobs Task Force.
(c)(1) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(A) One (1) Senate chair, who shall be appointed from the
membership of the Senate by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(B) One (1) House chair, who shall be appointed from the
membership of the House of Representatives by the Speaker of the House of
12/12/2024 10:41:50 AM

HB1073
Representatives or his or her designee;
(C) One (1) Senate cochair, who shall be appointed from
the membership of the Senate by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(D) One (1) House cochair, who shall be appointed from the
membership of the House of Representatives by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives or his or her designee;
(E) The Chair of the Senate Committee on City, County, and
Local Affairs or his or her designee;
(F) The Chair of the House Committee on City, County, and
Local Affairs or his or her designee;
(G) One (1) member of the minority party of the General
Assembly, who shall be appointed from the membership of the Senate by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(H) One (1) member of the minority party of the General
Assembly, who shall be appointed from the membership of the House of
Representatives by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(I) One (1) member of the majority party of the General
Assembly, who shall be appointed from the membership of the Senate by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(J) One (1) member of the majority party of the General
Assembly, who shall be appointed from the membership of the House of
Representatives by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(K) The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission or his or her designee;
(L) The Chair of the Arkansas Public Service Commission or
his or her designee;
(M) The Secretary of the Department of Energy and
Environment or his or her designee; and
(N) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Advanced Energy
Association or his or her designee.
(2) If a vacancy occurs on the task force, the vacancy shall be
filled by the same process as the original appointment.
(3)(A) The legislative members of the task force attending in
person shall be paid per diem and mileage as authorized by law for attendance
at meetings of interim committees of the General Assembly.
(B) The nonlegislative members of the task force may
12/12/2024 10:41:50 AM

HB1073
receive a per diem allowance of up to sixty dollars ($60.00) when in
attendance at regular or special meetings of the task force.
(d)(1) The cochairs of the task force shall call the first meeting of
the task force within sixty (60) to ninety (90) days of the effective date of
this act.
(2)(A) The task force shall conduct its meetings using a digital
access platform, including without limitation online or virtual meetings held
through Zoom.
(B) Meetings of the task force shall be held at least one
(1) time every month but may occur more often at the call of the cochairs of
the task force.
(3) The task force shall establish rules and procedures for
conducting business of the task force.
(4)(A)(i) A majority of the members of the task force shall
constitute a quorum for transacting business of the task force.
(ii) Members of the task force attending a meeting
virtually shall count for purposes of establishing a quorum.
(B) An affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum present,
in person or virtually, shall be required for the passage of a motion or
other task force action.
(5) The Bureau of Legislative Research shall provide staff for
the task force.
(e)(1) The task force shall study and propose:
(A) How to best prepare Arkansas to take full advantage of
the transition to advanced electricity systems with respect to job creation
and economic development; and
(B) The best pathways to:
(i) Identify industry training gaps within the state
for relevant advanced electricity resources, including solar, nuclear, fossil
fuels with carbon capture, use and sequestration, wind, geothermal,
hydropower, transmission and distributions systems, information systems,
instrumentation systems, and others;
(ii) Assess existing collegiate, technical,
apprenticeship, and career and technical education courses and training
opportunities currently available inside and outside of the state,
identifying best practices that can be replicated;
12/12/2024 10:41:50 AM

HB1073
(iii) Work with the Division of Workforce Services
to explore the use of funds received under the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act, 29 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq., to develop pathways to prosperity
for residents with barriers to employment through advanced energy jobs;
(iv) Identify emerging best practices regarding
workforce development and associated coordination of resources to prepare for
the advanced energy economy;
(v) Identify the magnitude and timetable associated
with new business development associated with an advanced energy economy;
(vi) Determine the appropriate ways and programs for
investor-owned utilities, municipal utilities, and member-owned utilities in
achieving an advanced energy system;
(vii) Prioritize approaches that are more applicable
to decarbonization and electrification of other energy sectors, including
without limitation industrial processes, transportation, and building
heating;
(viii) Identify currently available technologies and
technology gaps relevant to achieving an advanced energy system;
(ix) Consider all emerging technologies relevant to
achieving an advanced energy system;
(x) Identify the roles of various programs and
approaches in achieving an advanced energy system, including without
limitation energy efficiency, conservation, centralized and distributed
generation, demand response, energy storage, and project financing for power
sector infrastructure;
(xi) Identify and minimize impacts on vulnerable and
underserved communities in seeking to achieve an advanced energy system;
(xii) Prioritize environmental and economic
considerations relevant to achieving an advanced energy system; and
(xiii) Minimize new generation capacity additions
with significant emissions that would likely become costly stranded assets.
(2) To achieve the purpose under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section, the task force shall:
(A) Evaluate, study, and address the issues identified in
subdivision (e)(1) of this section; and
(B) Recommend specific solutions and legislation necessary
12/12/2024 10:41:50 AM

HB1073
to provide pathways for Arkansas to maximize advanced energy jobs and
economic development and to achieve a statewide advanced energy system.
(f) On or before December 31, 2026, the task force shall file with the
Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives a final written report of its activities, findings,
and recommendations, including recommendations for proposed legislation.
(g) If the task force determines it is necessary, the task force may
contract with one (1) or more facilitators to assist the task force with the
study and report required under this section.
(h) The task force expires on December 31, 2026.


























12/12/2024 10:41:50 AM